hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Fúró és csavarhúzó kiegészítők > Fúróállványok és -vezetők: Fúróvezetők; Fúróállványok
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за бормашини и винтоверти > Стойки и водачи за бормашини: Водачи за бормашини; Стойки за бормашини
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do wiercenia > Stojaki i prowadnice do wiertarek: Prowadnice wierteł; Stojaki do wiertarek
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 钻孔机/螺丝刀配件 > 钻架和导引架: 钻导引架; 钻架
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Matkap ve Tornavide Aksesuarları > Matkap Stantları ve Kılavuzları: Matkap Kılavuzları; Matkap Stantları
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru burghie și șurubelnițe > Suporturi și ghidaje pentru burghie: Ghidaje pentru burghie; Suporturi pentru burghie
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 드릴/스크루드라이버 부대용품 > 드릴 스탠드/가이드: 드릴 가이드; 드릴 스탠드
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Booraccessoires > Boorstandaards en -geleiders: Boorgeleiders; Boorstandaards
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện máy khoan và tua vít > Giá treo khoan và hướng dẫn: Hướng dẫn khoan; Giá treo khoan
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสว่านและไขควง > แท่นจับสว่าน: ตัวช่วยแนวการเจาะ; แท่นจับสว่าน
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para furadeiras > Suportes e guias para furadeiras: Guias para furadeiras; Suportes para furadeiras
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > ドリル関連用品 > ドリルスタンド・ドリルガイド: ドリルガイド; ドリルスタンド
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Gręžtuvų ir atsuktuvų priedai > Gręžimo stovai ir kreiptuvai: Gręžimo kreiptuvai; Gręžimo stovai
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Bor – tilbehør > Borestativer og styreskinner: Borestyreskinner; Borestativer
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Bohrzubehör > Bohrständer & -führungen: Bohrführungen; Bohrständer
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za bušilice i odvijače > Stalci i vodilice za bušilice: Vodilice za bušenje; Stalci za bušilice
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za vrtalnike in vijačnike > Stojala in vodila za vrtalnike: Vodila za vrtalnike; Stojala za vrtalnike
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour perceuses et visseuses > Supports et guides de perçage: Guides de perçage; Supports de perçage
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для дрелей и шуруповертов > Сверлильные стойки и направляющие: Направляющие для сверления; Сверлильные стойки
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo k vŕtačkám a skrutkovačom > Stojany a vodiče na vŕtačky: Vodiče na vŕtačky; Stojany na vŕtačky
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Poran ja ruuvinvääntimen lisätarvikkeet > Poratelineet ja ohjaimet: Poraohjaimet; Poratelineet
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per trapani e cacciavite > Guide e supporti per punte: Guide per punte; Supporti per punte
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ τρυπανιών & κατσαβιδιών > Βάσεις & οδηγοί τρυπανιών: Οδηγοί τρυπανιών; Βάσεις τρυπανιών
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Drill & Screwdriver Accessories > Drill Stands & Guides: Drill Guides; Drill Stands
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de berbequim e chave de fendas > Guias e apoios de berbequim: Guias de berbequim; Apoios de berbequim
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till borrmaskiner och skruvdragare > Borrmaskinställ och borrstativ: Borrguider; Borrstativ
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para taladros y destornilladores > Bases y guías para taladros: Guías para taladros; Bases para taladros
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 電鑽/電動起子配件 > 電鑽支架/導引架: 電鑽導引架; 電鑽支架
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k vrtačkám > Stojany na vrtačku: Vrtací stojany; Vrtačkové stojany
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør for driller og skrutrekkere > Drillstativer og -fester: Borfester; Borstativer